xx: Kermaviili
fi: Kermaviili
se: Gräddfil

en: Fermented dairy desserts
bg: Ферментирали млечни десерти
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés
hr: Fermentirani mliječni deserti
lt: Rauginti pieno desertai
nl: Gefermenteerde melkdesserts
pl: Fermentowane desery mleczne
zh: 发酵乳制甜点

en: Plain fermented dairy desserts
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés nature
hr: Obični fermentirani mliječni deserti
nl: Gefermenteerde melkdesserts natuur

en: Fermented dairy desserts with fruits
bg: Ферментирали млечни десерти с плодове
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés aux fruits
hr: Fermentirani mliječni deserti s voćem
lt: Rauginti pieno desertai su vaisiais
nl: gefermenteerde melkdesserts met vruchten
zh: 发酵乳制甜点附上水果

en: Flavoured fermented dairy desserts
fr: Desserts lactés fermentés aromatisés

fr: Spécialités laitières, spécialité laitière
nl: Melkspecialiteiten

fr: Spécialités laitières nature sucrées, Spécialité laitière nature sucrée
nl: Melkspecialiteiten (gesuikerd)

fr: Spécialités laitières nature non sucrées, Spécialité laitière nature
nl: Melkspecialiteiten natuur

fr: Spécialités laitières aux fruits, Spécialité laitière aux fruits sucrée non allégée en matières grasses
nl: Melkspecialiteiten met vructen

en: Kefir yogurts
de: Sahnekefir
fr: Yaourts au kéfir
hr: Kefir jogurti
nl: Kefiryoghurts

en: Fruit kefir yogurts
fr: Yaourts au kéfir aux fruits
hr: Voćni kefir jogurti
nl: Kefiryoghurts met vruchten

en: Bifidus yogurts
bg: Кисели млека Бифидус
de: Bifidus-Joghurt
es: Yogures bifidus, Yogures con bifidus
fi: Bifidus-jogurtit, bifidusjugurtit
fr: Yaourts au Bifidus
hr: Bifidus jogurti
it: Yogurt allo Bifidus
lt: Bifido jogurtai
nl: Bifidusyoghurts, Bifidus yoghurts

en: Plain bifidus yogurts
fr: Yaourts au bifidus nature, Lait fermenté de type yaourt nature au bifidus, spécialité laitière de type yaourt nature au bifidus
hr: Obični bifidus jogurti
nl: Bifidusyoghurts(natuur)

en: Fruit bifidus yogurts, Yogurt-type fermented milk with fruits with sugar with bifidus, Yogurt-type dairy specialty with fruits with sugar with bifidus
fr: Yaourts au bifidus aux fruits, Lait fermenté de type yaourt aux fruits sucré au bifidus, Spécialité laitière de type yaourt aromatisé aux fruits au bifidus
hr: Voćni bifidus jogurti
nl: Bifidusyoghurts met vruchten

en: Flavoured bifidus yogurts, Yogurt-type fermented flavoured milk with sugar with bifidus, Yogurt-type flavoured dairy specialty with sugar with bifidus
fr: Yaourts au bifidus aromatisés, Lait fermenté de type yaourt aromatisé sucré au bifidus, spécialité laitière de type yaourt aromatisé sucré au bifidus
hr: Aromatizirani bifidus jogurti
it: Yogurt aromatizzato al bifidus

en: Sweetened plain bifidus yogurts, Yogurt-type plain fermented milk with sugar with bifidus, Yogurt-type plain dairy specialty with sugar with bifidus
fr: Yaourts au bifidus sucrés natures, Lait fermenté de type yaourt nature sucré au bifidus, spécialité laitière de type yaourt nature sucré au bifidus

en: Faisselles, Drained soft fresh cheese around 6% fat, Faiselles
fr: Faisselles

fr: Fromages blancs, fromage blanc
de: Weißer Käse

en: Fat free plain fresh cream cheese
fr: Fromage blanc nature à 0% de matières grasses

en: Plain fresh cream cheese around 1% fat
fr: Fromage blanc nature à 1% de matières grasses environ